North Carolina, session 2025, SB350.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. LEGALIZATION OF POSSESSION AND SALE OF CANNABIS
SECTION 1.1.(a) The General Statutes are amended by adding a new Chapter to
read:
"Chapter 18D.
"Regulation of Cannabis.
"Article 1.
"General Provisions.
"§ 18D-100. Findings.
The General Assembly finds all of the following:
(1) Cannabis prohibition, like alcohol prohibition before it, has been a wasteful
and destructive failure. About half of Americans admit to having used
cannabis despite more than eight decades of prohibition.
(2) Regulating cannabis similarly to alcohol will replace the uncontrolled illicit
market with a well-regulated system. Legalization allows regulation and
control to protect consumers, workers, communities, and the environment.
(3) The prohibition of cannabis has had an unfair, disparate impact on persons
and communities of color. A 2020 report by the American Civil Liberties
Union found black individuals are three and six-tenths times as likely as white
individuals to be arrested for cannabis possession, despite nearly identical use
rates.
(4) The prohibition of cannabis diverts law enforcement resources from violent
and property crimes and subjects civilians to unnecessary police interactions.
(5) Keeping cannabis illegal deprives the State of thousands of legal jobs and
hundreds of millions of dollars in tax revenue.
(6) The use of cannabis should be legal for persons 21 years of age or older and
subject to taxation and regulation in a manner that does all of the following:
a. Controls the production and distribution of cannabis under a system of
licensing, regulation, and taxation.
b. Includes lab testing, potency labeling, secure packaging, restrictions
on advertising, and education about responsible use and risks.
*S350-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
c. Fosters a responsible industry, whereby businesses will only be
allowed to expand if they prioritize diversity, good wages,
sustainability, and community investment.
d. Promotes the participation of individuals most impacted by cannabis
prohibition in the legal, regulated industry.
e. Generates needed revenue, including to reinvest in communities that
have been disproportionately impacted by prohibition, for substance
abuse treatment and education, and to train more law enforcement
officers to detect impaired driving.
(7) It is necessary to ensure consistency and fairness in the application of this
Chapter throughout the State and that, therefore, the matters addressed by this
Chapter are, except as specified herein, matters of statewide concern.
"§ 18D-101. Definitions.
Unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions apply in this Chapter:
(1) Cannabis. – All parts of the plant of the genus cannabis, the seeds thereof, the
resin extracted from any part of the plant, and every compound, manufacture,
salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the plant, its seeds, or its resin,
including cannabis concentrate. "Cannabis" does not include hemp, nor does
it include fiber produced from the stalks, oil, or cake made from the seeds of
the plant, or sterilized seed of the plant, which is incapable of germination.
(2) Cannabis accessories. – Any equipment, products, or materials of any kind
that are used, intended for use, or designed for use in planting, propagating,
cultivating, growing, harvesting, composting, manufacturing, compounding,
converting, producing, processing, preparing, testing, analyzing, packaging,
repackaging, storing, vaporizing, or containing cannabis, or for ingesting,
inhaling, or otherwise introducing cannabis into the human body.
(3) Cannabis cultivation facility. – An entity registered to cultivate, prepare, and
package cannabis, and sell cannabis to other cannabis establishments. A
cannabis cultivation facility may not produce cannabis concentrates, tinctures,
extracts, or other cannabis products unless it is also licensed as a cannabis
product manufacturing facility.
(4) Cannabis establishment. – A cannabis cultivation facility, an on-site
consumption establishment, a cannabis testing facility, a cannabis product
manufacturing facility, a cannabis transporter, or any other type of cannabis
business authorized and registered by the Commission.
(5) Cannabis product manufacturing facility. – An entity registered to purchase
cannabis, manufacture, prepare, and package cannabis products, and sell
cannabis and cannabis products to other cannabis establishments but not to
consumers.
(6) Cannabis products. – Products that are comprised of cannabis, cannabis
concentrate, or cannabis extract and other ingredients and are intended for use
or consumption, such as, but not limited to, edible products, ointments, and
tinctures.
(7) Cannabis testing facility. – An entity registered to test cannabis for potency
and contaminants.
(8) Cannabis transporter. – An entity registered to transport cannabis between
cannabis establishments.
(9) Commission. – The North Carolina Alcoholic Beverage Control Commission
established under G.S. 18B-200.
Page 2 Senate Bill 350-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(10) Consumer. – A person 21 years of age or older who purchases cannabis or
cannabis products for personal use by persons 21 years of age or older, but not
for resale.
(11) Hemp. – The plant of the genus cannabis and any part of such plant, whether
growing or not, with a delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration that does
not exceed three-tenths percent (0.3%) on a dry weight basis of any part of the
plant cannabis, or per volume of weight of cannabis product, or the combined
percent of delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol and tetrahydrocannabinolic acid in
any part of the cannabis plant regardless of moisture content.
(12) Locality. – A city or county.
(13) Office. – The Office of Community Reinvestment.
(14) On-site consumption establishment. – An entity registered to sell cannabis or
cannabis products for on-site consumption.
(15) Possession limit. – Any of the following amounts:
a. Two ounces of cannabis in a form other than concentrated cannabis or
cannabis products.
b. Fifteen grams of concentrated cannabis.
c. Cannabis products containing no more than 2,000 milligrams of
tetrahydrocannabinol.
d. Six cannabis plants.
e. Any additional cannabis produced by the person's cannabis plants
provided that the possession of any amount of cannabis in excess of 2
ounces of cannabis, 15 grams of concentrated cannabis, and cannabis
products containing no more than 2,000 milligrams of
tetrahydrocannabinol must be limited to the same property where the
plants were cultivated.
(16) Public place. – Any place to which the general public has access. It does not
include an on-site consumption establishment.
"§ 18D-102. Applicability.
This Chapter does not apply to medical cannabis regulated under Article 44 of Chapter 90 of
the General Statutes.
"Article 2.
"Office of Community Reinvestment.
"§ 18D-200. Creation of the Office of Community Reinvestment.
There is established in the Commission the Office of Community Reinvestment. The
Governor shall appoint an Executive Director of the Office, who shall have at least five years of
experience in civil rights advocacy, civil rights litigation, or social justice.
"§ 18D-201. Establishment of funds.
(a) The following funds are established in the Commission:
(1) The Community Reinvestment and Repair Fund.
(2) The Social Opportunity Fund.
(3) The Cannabis Education and Technical Assistance Fund.
(b) No later than July 1 of each year, the Office shall produce and make publicly available
a report on how the Community Reinvestment and Repair Fund, Social Opportunity Fund, and
Cannabis Education and Technical Assistance Fund were allocated during the prior fiscal year.
(c) No later than November 1 of each year, the Office shall solicit public input on the
uses of the Community Reinvestment and Repair Fund, Social Opportunity Fund, and Cannabis
Education and Technical Assistance Fund. The Office of Community Reinvestment shall publish
a review of feedback received no later than December 15 of each year.
"§ 18D-202. Powers and duties of the Office.
Senate Bill 350-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
The Office shall promote and encourage full participation in the regulated cannabis industry
by people from communities that have previously been disproportionately harmed by cannabis
prohibition and enforcement in order to positively impact those communities. The Office shall
have all of the following powers and duties:
(1) Defining, by rule, the term "community reinvestment applicant" and
considering whether the definition should include any or all of the following:
a. Individuals with past convictions for a cannabis offense.
b. Individuals whose parent had a prior conviction for a cannabis offense.
c. Individuals who have had a less than honorable discharge from the
military due to cannabis.
d. Individuals from census tracts or other geographic areas
disproportionately impacted by cannabis enforcement, poverty,
unemployment, cannabis prohibition, mass incarceration, or systemic
racism.
e. Racial and ethnic minorities that have been disproportionately
impacted by cannabis enforcement.
f. Racial and ethnic minorities that have been disproportionately
excluded from the legal cannabis industry.
(2) Administering the Community Reinvestment and Repair Fund to improve the
well-being of individuals and communities that have experienced a
disproportionate negative impact from poverty, unemployment, cannabis
prohibition and enforcement, mass incarceration, or systemic racism. Before
determining how funds from the Community Reinvestment and Repair Fund
will be allocated, the Office shall promote and hold public meetings in at least
10 of the census tract areas that have been significantly impacted by poverty,
unemployment, cannabis prohibition, mass incarceration, or systemic racism
to seek input on the communities' needs and priorities for the Community
Reinvestment and Repair Fund. The Office of Community Reinvestment shall
distribute funds from the Community Reinvestment and Repair Fund in a
manner that improves the well-being of communities and individuals that have
been significantly impacted by poverty, unemployment, cannabis prohibition,
mass incarceration, or systemic racism. Permissible uses of the fund include,
but are not limited to, grants to nonprofit organizations or allocations to
government agencies for any of the following:
a. Housing assistance, including to promote home ownership among
members of minority groups that are underrepresented in home
ownership due to redlining or discrimination.
b. Reentry services, including job training and placement.
c. Scholarship assistance for low-income students.
d. Grants to community-based organizations to provide services to
prevent violence, support youth development, provide early
intervention for youth and families, and promote community stability
and safety.
e. Legal or civic aid.
(3) Administering the Social Opportunity Fund to issue zero-interest loans and
grants to community reinvestment applicants and cannabis establishments
owned and operated by community reinvestment applicants.
(4) Administering the Cannabis Education and Technical Assistance Fund to
provide free or low-cost training, education, and technical assistance for
individuals working in the cannabis industry or owning a cannabis
Page 4 Senate Bill 350-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
establishment, with a focus on individuals who would qualify as community
reinvestment applicants.
(5) Advising the Commission regarding regulations, including advising against
implementing regulations and financial requirements that unnecessarily
impose financial burdens that undermine the purposes of this Chapter and
providing recommendations on regulations related to diversity, community
reinvestment applications, and the Race to the Top scoring system.
(6) Producing reports and recommendations on community reinvestment from the
legal cannabis economy, including in ownership, management, and
employment.
(7) Investigating whether businesses are adhering to their obligations, including
those undertaken as part of the Race to the Top scoring system, and
recommending corrective action or discipline if they fail to do so, which may
include a suspension or revocation of licenses.
"Article 3.
"Registration and Licensure.
"§ 18D-300. Registration with the Commission.
(a) Each application or renewal application for an annual registration to operate a
cannabis establishment shall be submitted to the Commission. A renewal application may be
submitted up to 90 days prior to the expiration of the cannabis establishment's registration.
(b) The Commission shall begin accepting and processing applications to operate
cannabis establishments from community reinvestment applicants one year after the effective
date of this Chapter.
(c) The Commission may begin accepting and processing applications to operate
cannabis establishments from applicants other than community reinvestment applicants no earlier
than one year and 180 days after the effective date of this Chapter.
(d) Upon receiving an application or renewal application for a cannabis establishment,
the Commission shall immediately forward a copy of each application and half of the registration
application fee to the local regulatory authority for the locality in which the applicant desires to
operate the cannabis establishment, unless the locality has not designated a local regulatory
authority.
(e) Within 120 days after receiving an application or renewal application, the
Commission shall issue an annual registration or a conditional registration to the applicant, unless
the Commission finds the applicant is not in compliance with rules enacted by the Commission
or the Commission is notified by the relevant locality that the applicant is not in compliance with
ordinances and regulations in effect at the time of application.
(f) Applicants may apply for conditional approval if they have not purchased or leased
the property where their cannabis establishment would be located. If the applicant is otherwise
qualified, the Commission shall provide conditional approval. Once the applicant provides the
Commission with a completed, supplemental application that includes the premises, the
Commission shall forward the information to the local regulatory authority and approve or reject
the final application within 45 days from the date of submission.
(g) Upon denial of an application, the Commission shall notify the applicant in writing
of the specific reason for its denial.
(h) Cannabis establishments, and the books and records maintained and created by
cannabis establishments, are subject to inspection by the Commission.
"§ 18D-301. Licensure and local control.
(a) An on-site consumption establishment shall only operate if the local regulatory
authority in the locality where it is located issued a permit, license, or registration that expressly
allows the operation of the on-site consumption establishment.
Senate Bill 350-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b) Except as provided in this subsection, a locality may prohibit the operation of any or
all types of cannabis establishments within its jurisdiction through the enactment of an ordinance.
A locality's prohibition on cannabis establishments shall not prohibit transportation through the
locality by cannabis establishments located in other jurisdictions.
(c) A locality may enact ordinances or regulations not in conflict with this Chapter, or
with rules enacted pursuant to this Chapter, governing the time, place, manner, and number of
cannabis establishment operations. A locality may establish civil penalties for violation of an
ordinance or regulations governing the time, place, and manner of a cannabis establishment that
may operate in such locality.
(d) No locality may negotiate or enter into a host community agreement with a cannabis
establishment or a cannabis establishment applicant. As used in this subsection, a "host
community agreement" means an agreement that the cannabis establishment or applicant provide
monies, donations, in-kind contributions, services, or anything of value to the locality.
"Article 4.
"Operation of Cannabis Stores.
"§ 18D-400. Definitions.
For purposes of this Article, unless the context requires otherwise, the term "local board" is
as defined in G.S. 18B-101.
"§ 18D-401. Sale of cannabis in ABC stores and cannabis stores.
(a) Except as provided in Articles 1 and 3 of this Chapter, cannabis and cannabis products
may only be sold in ABC stores or cannabis stores operated by local boards. For purposes of this
subsection, the term "sold only in ABC stores or cannabis stores operated by local boards"
includes online orders placed in accordance with subsection (b) of this section.
(b) An ABC store or cannabis store may accept an online order, including payment, for
cannabis sold in its store. An order for cannabis placed online pursuant to this subsection shall
be picked up in person at the store by the individual who placed the order. An order placed online
pursuant to this subsection shall include the name and unique identifier number of the individual
placing the order, who shall be at least 21 years of age as shown on the form of identification
authorized pursuant to G.S. 18B-302(d)(1) and otherwise legally authorized to purchase
cannabis. An employee of the ABC store or cannabis store shall confirm that an online order for
cannabis is picked up in person at the store by the individual who placed the order by verifying
the individual's identification that conforms to the identifying information contained in the online
order.
"§ 18D-402. Location, opening, and closing of stores.
The provisions of G.S. 18B-801 shall apply to cannabis stores.
"§ 18D-403. When stores operate.
(a) No cannabis store shall be open, and no ABC store or cannabis store employee shall
sell cannabis, between 9:00 P.M. and 9:00 A.M. The local board shall otherwise determine
opening and closing hours of its stores.
(b) No cannabis store shall be open, and no ABC store or cannabis store employee shall
sell cannabis, on any Sunday, Thanksgiving Day, or Christmas Day. A local board may otherwise
determine the days on which its stores shall be closed.
"§ 18D-404. Rules.
The Commission may adopt rules concerning the organization and operation of self-service
cannabis stores, the size of cannabis store signs, the display of cannabis, solicitation in and around
ABC stores, and any other subject relating to the efficient operation of cannabis stores.
"Article 5.
"Possession and Use of Cannabis.
"§ 18D-500. Personal use of cannabis.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, except as otherwise provided in this Chapter,
the following acts are not unlawful and shall not be a criminal or civil offense under State law or
Page 6 Senate Bill 350-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
an ordinance of any locality, or be a basis for seizure or forfeiture of assets under State law, for
persons 21 years of age or older:
(1) Possessing, consuming, ingesting, smoking, growing, using, processing,
purchasing, or transporting an amount of cannabis that does not exceed the
possession limit.
(2) Transferring an amount of cannabis that does not exceed the possession limit
to a person who is 21 years of age or older without remuneration.
(3) Controlling property where actions described by this section occur.
(4) Assisting another person who is 21 years of age or older in any of the acts
described in this section.
"§ 18D-501. Restrictions on personal cultivation; penalty.
(a) It is unlawful to cultivate cannabis plants in any of the following ways:
(1) Cannabis plants may not be cultivated in a location where plants are subject
to public view, including view from another private property, without the use
of binoculars, aircraft, or other optical aids.
(2) A person who cultivates cannabis must take reasonable precautions to ensure
the plants are secure from unauthorized access and access by persons under
21 years of age. For purposes of illustration and not limitation, cultivating
cannabis in an enclosed, locked space that persons under 21 years of age do
not possess a key to constitutes reasonable precautions.
(3) Cannabis cultivation may only occur on property lawfully in possession of the
cultivator or with the consent of the person in lawful possession of the
property.
(b) A person who violates subsection (a) of this section is guilty of an infraction,
punishable by a fine of up to seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) or up to 75 hours of
community service.
"§ 18D-502. Public smoking prohibited; penalty.
(a) It is unlawful to smoke cannabis in a public place.
(b) It is unlawful to smoke cannabis in an area of an on-site consumption establishment
where cannabis smoking is prohibited.
(c) A person who violates this section is guilty of an infraction, punishable by a fine of
up to fifty dollars ($50.00) or up to five hours of community service.
"§ 18D-503. Consuming cannabis while operating a moving vehicle prohibited; penalty.
(a) No person shall consume cannabis while operating or driving a motor vehicle, boat,
vessel, aircraft, or other motorized device used for transportation.
(b) Unless the conduct is covered under some other provision of law providing greater
punishment, a person who violates subsection (a) of this section, and only consumed cannabis,
is guilty of an infraction, punishable as follows:
(1) For a first offense, any or all of the following:
a. A fine not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00).
b. Not more than 25 hours of community service.
c. Suspension of the person's drivers license for up to six months.
(2) For a second or subsequent offense, any or all of the following:
a. A fine not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00).
b. Not more than 50 hours of community service.
c. Suspension of the person's drivers license for up to one year.
"§ 18D-504. False identification; penalty.
(a) A person who is under 21 years of age may not present or offer to a cannabis
establishment or the cannabis establishment's agent or employee any written or oral evidence of
age that is false, fraudulent, or not actually the minor's own for either of the following purposes:
Senate Bill 350-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Purchasing, attempting to purchase, or otherwise procuring or attempting to
procure cannabis.
(2) Gaining access to a cannabis establishment.
(b) A person who violates this section is guilty of an infraction, punishable by a fine of
not more than one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00) or up to 15 hours of community service.
"§ 18D-505. Unlawful cannabis extraction; penalty.
(a) No person, other than a cannabis product manufacturing facility complying with this
Chapter and Commission rules, may perform solvent-based extractions on cannabis using
solvents other than water, glycerin, propylene glycol, vegetable oil, or food-grade ethanol.
(b) No person may extract compounds from cannabis using ethanol in the presence or
vicinity of open flame.
(c) A person who violates this section is guilty of a Class E felony, which shall include a
fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).
"§ 18D-506. Cannabis accessories authorized.
(a) Except as provided in this section, notwithstanding any other provision of law, it is
not unlawful and shall not be an offense under State law for persons 21 years of age or older to
manufacture, possess, possess with intent to distribute, or purchase cannabis accessories or to
distribute or sell cannabis accessories to a person who is 21 years of age or older.
(b) Except as provided in this section, a person who is 21 years of age or older is
authorized to manufacture, possess, and purchase cannabis accessories and to distribute or sell
cannabis accessories to a person who is 21 years of age or older. This section is intended to meet
the requirements of section 863 of Title 21 of the United States Code by authorizing, under State
law, any person in compliance with this Chapter to manufacture, possess, or distribute cannabis
accessories.
(c) No person may manufacture, distribute, or sell cannabis accessories that violate rules
adopted by the Commission. A first offense under this section is an infraction, punishable by a
fine of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) and forfeiture of the cannabis accessories. A second
or subsequent offense of this section is a Class A1 misdemeanor punishable by a fine of up to
five thousand dollars ($5,000), up to 180 days in jail, or both, and forfeiture of the cannabis
accessories.
"§ 18D-507. Purchasing of cannabis or cannabis accessories unlawful in certain cases;
penalties; treatment and education programs and services.
(a) No person to whom cannabis or cannabis accessories may not lawfully be sold under
this Chapter shall consume, purchase, or possess, or attempt to consume, purchase, or possess,
any cannabis or cannabis accessories.
(b) Any person 18 years of age or older who violates subsection (a) of this section is
guilty of an infraction, punishable by a fine of up to twenty-five dollars ($25.00) or up to five
hours of community service. Additionally, the person shall be ordered to enter a substance abuse
treatment or education program, or both, if available, that in the opinion of the court best suits
the needs of the person.
(c) Any juvenile who violates subsection (a) of this section is guilty of an infraction,
punishable by a fine of up to twenty-five dollars ($25.00) or up to five hours of community
service. Additionally, the juvenile shall be ordered to enter a substance abuse treatment or
education program, or both, if available, that in the opinion of the court best suits the needs of
the juvenile.
"§ 18D-508. Nondiscrimination for personal use of cannabis.
(a) A person shall not be subject to arrest, prosecution, or penalty in any manner, or be
denied any right or privilege, including, but not limited to, disciplinary action by a business,
occupational, or professional licensing board or bureau, solely for conduct permitted under this
Chapter.
Page 8 Senate Bill 350-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b) Except as provided in this section, neither the State nor any of its political
subdivisions may impose any penalty or deny any benefit or entitlement for conduct permitted
under this Chapter or for the presence of cannabinoids or cannabinoid metabolites in the urine,
blood, saliva, breath, hair, or other tissue or fluid of a person who is 21 years of age or older.
(c) Except as provided in this section, neither the State nor any of its political
subdivisions may deny a drivers license, a professional license, housing assistance, social
services, or other benefits based on cannabis use or for the presence of cannabinoids or
cannabinoid metabolites in the urine, blood, saliva, breath, hair, or other tissue or fluid of a person
who is 21 years of age or older.
(d) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a person shall not be denied
custody of or visitation with a minor for acting in accordance with this Chapter, unless the
person's behavior is such that it creates an unreasonable danger to the minor that can be clearly
articulated and substantiated.
(e) Except as provided in this section, neither the State nor any of its political
subdivisions may deny employment or a contract to a person for engaging in conduct permitted
under this Chapter for a prior conviction for a nonviolent cannabis offense that does not involve
distribution to minors or for testing positive for the presence of cannabinoids or cannabinoid
metabolites in the urine, blood, saliva, breath, hair, or other tissue or fluid of the individual's
body.
(f) For the purpose of medical care, including organ and tissue transplants, the use of
cannabis does not constitute the use of an illicit substance or otherwise disqualify a person from
needed medical care and may only be considered with respect to evidence-based clinical criteria.
(g) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, unless there is a specific finding
that the individual's use, cultivation, or possession of cannabis could create a danger to the
individual or another person, it shall not be a violation of conditions of parole, probation, or
pretrial release to do either of the following:
(1) Engage in conduct allowed by this Chapter.
(2) Test positive for cannabis, delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol, or any other
cannabinoid or metabolite of cannabis.
(h) This section does not do any of the following:
(1) Prevent a government employer from disciplining an employee or contractor
for ingesting cannabis in the workplace or for working while impaired by
cannabis.
(2) Apply to the extent that they conflict with a governmental employer's
obligations under federal law or regulations or to the extent that they would
disqualify the entity from a monetary or licensing-related benefit under federal
law or regulations.
(3) Authorize any person to engage in, and does not prevent the imposition of any
civil, criminal, discipline, or other penalties, including discipline or
termination by a governmental employer, any task while under the influence
of cannabis, when doing so would constitute negligence or professional
malpractice.
"§ 18D-509. Lawful operation of cannabis-related facilities.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, engaging in any activities involving
cannabis, cannabis accessories, or cannabis products, if the person conducting the activities has
obtained a current, valid registration to operate a cannabis establishment or is acting in his or her
capacity as an owner, employee, or agent of a registered cannabis establishment and the activities
are within the scope of activities allowed by the Commission for that type of cannabis
establishment, is not unlawful and shall not be an offense under State law or be a basis for seizure
or forfeiture of assets under State law.
Senate Bill 350-First Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b) Nothing in this section prevents the imposition of penalties for violating this Chapter
or rules adopted by the Commission or localities pursuant to this Chapter.
"§ 18D-510. Verifying the age of cannabis consumers.
(a) A cannabis establishment or an agent or staffer of a cannabis establishment may not
sell, deliver, distribute, give, transfer, or otherwise furnish cannabis to a person under the age of
21.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, in a prosecution for selling, transferring,
delivering, distributing, giving, or otherwise furnishing cannabis, cannabis products, or cannabis
accessories to any person who is under 21 years of age, it is a complete defense if both of the
following requirements are met:
(1) The person who sold, gave, or otherwise furnished cannabis, cannabis
products, or cannabis accessories was a retail cannabis store or on-site
consumption establishment or was acting in his or her capacity as an owner,
employee, or agent of a retail cannabis store or on-site consumption
establishment at the time the cannabis, cannabis products, or cannabis
accessories were sold, given, or otherwise furnished to the person.
(2) Before selling, giving, or otherwise furnishing cannabis, cannabis products,
or cannabis accessories to a person who is under 21 years of age, the person
who sold, gave, or otherwise furnished the cannabis or cannabis accessories
or a staffer or agent of the retail cannabis store was shown a document that
appeared to be issued by an agency of a federal, state, tribal, or foreign
sovereign government and that indicated that the person to whom the cannabis
or cannabis accessories were sold, given, or otherwise furnished was 21 years
of age or older at the time the cannabis or cannabis accessories were sold,
given, or otherwise furnished to the person.
(c) Subsection (b) of this section does not apply if both of the following requirements are
met:
(1) The document that was shown to the person who sold, gave, or otherwise
furnished the cannabis, cannabis products, or cannabis accessories was
counterfeit, forged, altered, or issued to a person other than the person to
whom the cannabis, cannabis products, or cannabis accessories were sold,
given, or otherwise furnished.
(2) Under the circumstances, a reasonable person would have known or suspected
that the document was counterfeit, forged, altered, or issued to a person other
than the person to whom the cannabis, cannabis products, or cannabis
accessories were sold, given, or otherwise furnished.
"§ 18D-511. Occupational licensing.
(a) A holder of a professional or occupational license may not be subject to professional
discipline for providing advice or services related to cannabis establishments or applications to
operate cannabis establishments on the basis that cannabis is illegal under federal law.
(b) An applicant for a professional or occupational license may not be denied a license
based on previous employment related to cannabis establishments operating in accordance with
State law.
"§ 18D-512. Private property and tenant rights.
(a) Except as provided in this section, the provisions of this Chapter do not require any
person, corporation, or any other entity that occupies, owns, or controls a property to allow the
consumption, cultivation, display, sale, or transfer of cannabis on or in that property.
(b) Except as provided in this section, a landlord or property manager may not refuse to
rent to a tenant, or otherwise discriminate against the tenant, based on a past conviction for a
cannabis offense.
Page 10 Senate Bill 350-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) Except as provided in this section, in the case of the rental of a residential dwelling,
a landlord or property manager may not prohibit the possession of cannabis or the consumption
of cannabis by nonsmoked means.
(d) Subsections (a) through (c) of this section do not apply if any of the following
requirements are met:
(1) The tenant is not leasing the entire dwelling.
(2) The residence is incidental to detention or the provision of medical, geriatric,
educational, counseling, religious, or similar service.
(3) The residence is a transitional housing or sober living facility.
(4) Failing to prohibit cannabis possession or consumption would violate federal
law or regulations or cause the landlord to lose a monetary or licensing-related
benefit under federal law or regulations.
(e) After a warning, a landlord or property manager may take action against a tenant if
the tenant's use of cannabis creates an odor that interferes with others' peaceful enjoyment of
their home or property.
"§ 18D-513. Contracts enforceable.
It is the public policy of this State that contracts related to the operation of a cannabis
establishment registered pursuant to this Chapter should be enforceable. It is the public policy of
this State that no contract entered into by a cannabis establishment or its employees or agents as
permitted pursuant to a valid registration, or by those who allow property to be used by a cannabis
establishment, its employees, or its agents as permitted pursuant to a valid registration, shall be
unenforceable on the basis that cultivating, obtaining, manufacturing, distributing, dispensing,
transporting, selling, possessing, or using cannabis or hemp is prohibited by federal law.
"§ 18D-514. Respecting State law.
(a) No law enforcement officer employed by an agency that receives State or local
government funds shall expend any State or local resources, including the officer's time, to effect
any arrest or seizure of cannabis, or conduct any investigation, on the sole basis of activity the
officer believes to constitute a violation of federal law if the officer has reason to believe that
such activity is in compliance with this Chapter, nor shall any such officer expend any State or
local resources, including the officer's time, to provide any information or logistical support
related to such activity to any federal law enforcement authority or prosecuting entity.
(b) No agency or political subdivision of the State may rely on a violation of federal law
related to cannabis as the sole basis for taking an adverse action against a person.
(c) For the purposes of State law, actions related to cannabis are considered lawful as
long as they are in accordance with this Chapter.
"§ 18D-515. Rulemaking.
(a) Not later than 180 days after the effective date of this Chapter, the Commission shall
adopt rules necessary for implementation of this Chapter. Such rules shall not prohibit the
operation of cannabis establishments, either expressly or through application, nor require such a
high investment of risk, money, time, or any other resource or asset that the operation of a
cannabis establishment is not worthy of being carried out in practice by a reasonably prudent
businessperson. Such regulations shall include all of the following:
(1) Procedures for the issuance, renewal, suspension, and revocation of a
registration to operate a cannabis establishment, with such procedures subject
to all requirements of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.
(2) Rules, procedures, and policies to promote and encourage full participation in
the regulated cannabis industry by people from communities that have
previously been disproportionately harmed by cannabis prohibition and
enforcement and to positively impact those communities, which shall reflect
input from the Office of Community Reinvestment, including all of the
following:
Senate Bill 350-First Edition Page 11

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a. Conducting necessary and appropriate outreach to diverse groups that
may qualify for participation in activities under this Chapter.
b. Requiring each cannabis establishment to establish and adhere to
policies that encourage diversity in employment, contracting, and
other professional opportunities.
c. Requiring any cannabis establishment with 25 or more employees to
retain a diversity officer.
d. Requiring each cannabis establishment to report on the diversity of its
workforce, management, contracts, and ownership by January 1 of
each year.
e. Issuing rules allowing community reinvestment applicants to apply
for, and be licensed for, cannabis establishment registrations no less
than 180 days prior to applicants that are not community reinvestment
applicants.
(3) A Race to the Top scoring system to make the expansion of a cannabis
establishment to more than two locations contingent on the cannabis
establishment's contributions to opportunity and to benefiting the community.
The system must reflect input from the Office of Community Reinvestment
and shall include, but need not be limited to, considerations of diversity in the
cannabis establishment's ownership and workforce, including in management;
employment of reentering citizens with prior convictions; minority
ownership; compensation packages and benefits for workers; investing in
economically disadvantaged areas; whether the cannabis establishment
incorporates principles of environmental resiliency or sustainability, including
energy efficiency; or whether the principals are community reinvestment
applicants.
(4) A limit on the number of cannabis establishments a major investor may invest
in, unless each additional establishment is owned and operated by a
community reinvestment applicant.
(5) A schedule of reasonable application, registration, and renewal fees, provided
application fees shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), with this
upper limit adjusted annually for inflation, unless the Commission determines
a greater fee is necessary to carry out its responsibilities under this Chapter.
(6) Qualifications for registration that are directly and demonstrably related to the
operation of a cannabis establishment and that may not disqualify applicants
solely for cannabis offenses prior to the effective date of this Chapter.
(7) Security requirements.
(8) Requirements for the transportation and storage of cannabis and cannabis
products by cannabis establishments.
(9) Requirements for the delivery of cannabis and cannabis products to
consumers, including a prohibition on business names, logos, and other
identifying language or images on delivery vehicles and a prohibition on
delivering to any address located on land owned by the federal government or
any address on land or in a building leased by the federal government.
(10) Employment and training requirements, including requiring that each
cannabis establishment create an identification badge for each employee or
agent. These requirements may not disqualify applicants solely for cannabis
offenses prior to the effective date of this Chapter.
(11) Requirements designed to prevent the sale or diversion of cannabis and
cannabis products to persons under the age of 21.
Page 12 Senate Bill 350-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(12) Requirements for cannabis and cannabis products sold or distributed by a
cannabis establishment, including prohibiting any misleading labeling and
requiring cannabis product labels to include all of the following:
a. The length of time it typically takes for the product to take effect.
b. A disclosure of ingredients and possible allergens.
c. A nutritional fact panel.
d. Requiring opaque, child-resistant packaging, which must be designed
or constructed to be significantly difficult for children under 5 years
of age to open and not difficult for normal adults to use properly as
defined by 16 C.F.R. § 1700.20.
e. Requiring that edible cannabis products be clearly identifiable, when
practicable, with a standard symbol indicating that they contain
cannabis.
(13) Health and safety regulations and standards for the manufacture of cannabis
products and both the indoor and outdoor cultivation of cannabis by cannabis
establishments.
(14) Restrictions on advertising, marketing, and signage, including, but not limited
to, a prohibition on mass-market campaigns that have a high likelihood of
reaching minors.
(15) Rules to create at least six tiers of cannabis cultivation facilities, based on the
size of the facility or the number of plants cultivated, and whether the
cultivation occurs outdoors, indoors, or in a greenhouse. Security regulations
and licensing fees must vary based on the size of the cultivation facility.
(16) Restrictions or prohibitions on additives to cannabis and cannabis-infused
products, including, but not limited to, those that are toxic or designed to make
the product more addictive.
(17) Prohibitions on products that are designed to make the product more appealing
to children, including prohibiting the use of any images designed or likely to
appeal to minors, including cartoons, toys, animals, or children, and any other
likeness to images, characters, or phrases that are popularly used to advertise
to children.
(18) Restrictions on the use of pesticides that are injurious to human health.
(19) Regulations governing visits to cannabis cultivation facilities and cannabis
product manufacturing facilities, including requiring the cannabis
establishment to log visitors.
(20) A definition of the amount of delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol that constitutes a
single serving in a cannabis product.
(21) Standards for the safe manufacture of cannabis extracts and concentrates.
(22) Requirements that educational materials be disseminated to consumers who
purchase cannabis-infused products.
(23) Requirements for random sample testing to ensure quality control, including
by ensuring that cannabis and cannabis-infused products are accurately
labeled for potency. Unless the Commission determines that remediation or
treatment is sufficient to ensure product safety, the testing analysis shall
include testing for residual solvents, poisons, or toxins; harmful chemicals;
dangerous molds or mildew; filth; and harmful microbials such as E. coli or
salmonella and pesticides.
(24) Standards for the operation of cannabis testing facilities, including
requirements for equipment and qualifications for personnel.
(25) Civil penalties for the failure to comply with rules made pursuant to this
Chapter.
Senate Bill 350-First Edition Page 13

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(26) Procedures for collecting taxes levied on cannabis establishments.
(27) Requirements for on-site consumption establishments, including for security,
ventilation, odor control, and consumption by patrons. These rules may
include a prohibition on smoking indoors.
(b) After consulting with researchers knowledgeable about the risks and benefits of
cannabis and providing an opportunity for public comment, the Commission shall develop a
scientifically accurate safety information label, handout, or both, which shall be available to each
adult-use cannabis consumer. The label or handout shall include both of the following:
(1) Advice about the potential risks of cannabis, including any of the following:
a. The risks of driving under the influence of cannabis and the fact that
doing so is illegal.
b. Any adverse effects unique to younger adults, including related to the
developing mind.
c. Potential adverse events and other risks.
d. Risks of using cannabis during pregnancy or breastfeeding.
(2) The need to safeguard all cannabis and cannabis products from children and
pets.
(c) The Commission shall review and update the safety information materials at least
once every two years to ensure they remain accurate. The review period shall include soliciting
input from researchers knowledgeable about the risks and benefits of cannabis and an opportunity
for public comment.
(d) In order to ensure that individual privacy is protected, the Commission shall not
require a consumer to provide a retail cannabis store with personal information other than
government-issued identification to determine the consumer's age and a retail cannabis store shall
not be required to acquire and record personal information about consumers."
SECTION 1.1.(b) This section becomes effective January 1, 2026, and applies to
offenses committed on or after that date.
SECTION 1.2.(a) Subchapter I of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes is amended
by adding a new Article to read:
"Article 2F.
"Tax on Cannabis.
"§ 105-113.150. Definitions.
The definitions in G.S. 18D-101, to the extent they do not conflict with this Article, and the
following definitions apply in this Article:
(1) Cannabis. – All parts of the plant of the genus cannabis, the seeds thereof, the
resin extracted from any part of the plant, and every compound, manufacture
salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the plant, its seeds, or its resin,
including cannabis concentrate. "Cannabis" does not include hemp, nor does
it include fiber produced from the stalks, oil, or cake made from the seeds of
the plant, or sterilized seed of the plant, which is incapable of germination.
(2) Cannabis concentrate. – Any form of concentration, including extracts, oils,
tinctures, shatter, and waxes, that is extracted from cannabis.
(3) Cannabis edible product. – A product containing cannabis or cannabis
concentrate, combined with other ingredients, that is intended for use or
consumption through ingestion, including sublingual or oral absorption.
(4) Cannabis plant material. – For purposes of this Article, "cannabis plant
material" means cannabis flower, cannabis trim and all parts of any plant or
species of the genus cannabis, or any infra specific taxon thereof, excluding a
growing plant, and the seeds thereof. "Cannabis plant material" does not
include hemp.
Page 14 Senate Bill 350-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(5) Manufacturer. – A cannabis product manufacturing facility as defined in
G.S. 18D-101.
(6) THC. – Tetrahydrocannabinol, including, but not limited to, delta-7,
delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinol, delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol, and
delta-10-tetrahydrocannabinol, and any material, compound, mixture, or
preparation which contains their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, whenever
the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the
specific chemical designation, regardless of the source, except (i) dronabinol
substituted in sesame oil and encapsulated in a soft gelatin capsule in a federal
Food and Drug Administration or successor agency approved product or (ii)
any tetrahydrocannabinol product that has been approved by the federal Food
and Drug Administration or successor agency to have a medical use and
reclassified in any schedule of controlled substances or unscheduled by the
federal Drug Enforcement Administration or successor agency.
(7) Total THC. – The sum of the percentages by weight of tetrahydrocannabinolic
acid, multiplied by eight hundred seventy-seven-thousandths, plus the
percentage weight of THC.
"§ 105-113.151. Excise tax on cannabis.
An excise tax is levied on cannabis and cannabis products possessed by manufacturers at the
following rates:
(1) Cannabis plant material, at the rate of six hundred twenty-five-thousandths of
one cent (0.00625 of 1¢) per milligram of total THC, as reflected on the
product label.
(2) Cannabis edible products, at the rate of two hundred seventy-five
ten-thousandths of one cent (0.0275 of 1¢) per milligram of total THC, as
reflected on the product label.
(3) Cannabis, other than cannabis plant material or cannabis edible products, at
the rate of nine-tenths of one cent (0.9 of 1¢) per milligram of total THC, as
reflected on the product label.
"§ 105-113.152. When tax payable; revenue stamps.
(a) The tax imposed by this Article is payable by any manufacturer who possesses
cannabis or cannabis products upon which the tax has not been paid, as evidence by a stamp. The
tax is payable within 48 hours after the manufacturer acquires actual or constructive possession
of the non-tax-paid cannabis or cannabis products taxed under G.S. 105-113.151, exclusive of
Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays of this State, in which case the tax is payable on the next
working day. Upon payment of the tax, the manufacturer shall permanently affix the appropriate
stamps to the cannabis or cannabis product. Once the tax due on the cannabis or cannabis product
has been paid, no additional tax is due under this Article even though the cannabis or cannabis
product may be handled by other manufacturers.
(b) The Secretary shall issue stamps to affix to cannabis and cannabis products taxed
under G.S. 105-113.151 to indicate payment of the tax required by this Article. Manufacturers
shall report the taxes payable under this Article at the time and on the return prescribed by the
Secretary. Upon payment of the tax, the Secretary shall issue stamps in an amount equal to the
amount of the tax paid. Taxes may be paid, and stamps may be issued in a manner determined
by the Secretary.
"§ 105-113.153. Administration.
Article 9 of this Chapter applies to this Article.
"§ 105-113.154. Assessments.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an assessment against a manufacturer who
possesses cannabis or cannabis products subject to tax under this Article to which a stamp has
not been affixed as required by this Article shall be made as provided in this section. The
Senate Bill 350-First Edition Page 15

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Secretary shall assess a tax, applicable penalties, and interest based on personal knowledge or
information available to the Secretary. The Secretary shall notify the manufacturer in writing of
the amount of the tax, penalty, and interest due, and demand shall be either mailed to the
manufacturer at the manufacturer's last known address or served on the manufacturer in person.
If the manufacturer does not pay the tax, penalty, and interest immediately upon receipt of the
notice and demand, the Secretary shall collect the tax, penalty, and interest pursuant to the
jeopardy collection procedures in G.S. 105-241.23 or the general collection procedures in
G.S. 105-242, including causing execution to be issued immediately against the personal
property of the manufacturer, unless the manufacturer files with the Secretary a bond in the
amount of the asserted liability for the tax, penalty, and interest. The Secretary shall use all means
available to collect the tax, penalty, and interest from any property in which the manufacturer
has a legal, equitable, or beneficial interest. The manufacturer may seek review of the assessment
as provided in Article 9 of this Chapter.
"§ 105-113.155. Confidentiality of information.
Information obtained by the Department in the course of administering the tax imposed by
this Article, including information on whether the Department has issued a revenue stamp to a
person, is confidential tax information and is subject to the provisions of G.S. 105-259.
"§ 105-113.156. Use of tax proceeds.
(a) Special Account. – The Cannabis Regulation Account is established as a special
nonreverting account. The Secretary shall credit the proceeds of the tax levied by this Article to
the Account.
(b) Distribution. – The Secretary shall distribute unencumbered tax proceeds in the
Cannabis Regulation Account (Account) on a quarterly or more frequent basis. Tax proceeds in
the Account are unencumbered when they are collectible under G.S. 105-241.22. The Secretary
shall distribute the unencumbered tax proceeds in the Account as follows:
(1) Fifty percent (50%) to the North Carolina Alcoholic Beverage Control
Commission for purposes consistent with the regulation of cannabis in
accordance with Chapter 18D of the General Statutes.
(2) Twenty-five percent (25%) to the Community Reinvestment and Repair Fund
established under Chapter 18D of the General Statutes.
(3) Ten percent (10%) to the Social Opportunity Fund established under Chapter
18D of the General Statutes.
(4) Three percent (3%) to the Cannabis Education and Technical Assistance Fund
established under Chapter 18D of the General Statutes.
(5) Seven percent (7%) to the Department of Health and Human Services for use
in evidence-based, voluntary programs for the prevention or treatment of
substance abuse.
(6) Two percent (2%) to the Department of Health and Human Services for a
scientifically and medically accurate public education campaign educating
youth and adults about the health and safety risks of alcohol, tobacco,
cannabis, and other substances, including the risks of driving while impaired.
(7) Two percent (2%) to the Department of Health and Human Services to fund
diverse scientific, academic, or medical research on cannabis or
endocannabinoids, including research exploring the benefits of cannabis,
provided that all funded research data, results, and papers shall be released
into the public domain and shall be published for free and open access by the
public and by other researchers.
(8) Up to one percent (1%) to the Department of Public Safety to fund Advanced
Roadside Impaired Driving Enforcement and drug recognition expert training.
(9) Any remaining funds shall be deposited in the General Fund."
Page 16 Senate Bill 350-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 1.2.(b) This section is effective for taxable years beginning on or after
January 1, 2026.

PART II. LEGALIZATION OF MEDICAL CANNABIS
SECTION 2.1. Chapter 90 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read:
"Article 44.
"North Carolina Medical Cannabis Act.
"§ 90-748. Short title.
This Article shall be known and may be cited as the "North Carolina Medical Cannabis Act."
"§ 90-749. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
(1) Department. – The North Carolina Department of Health and Human
Services.
(2) Patient. – A person who has been issued a written certification described in
G.S. 90-751.
(3) Physician. – A person who is licensed to prescribe drugs under the laws of this
State.
"§ 90-750. Protections for the medical use of cannabis.
(a) A patient shall not be subject to arrest, prosecution, or penalty in any manner, or
denied any right or privilege, including, but not limited to, civil penalty or disciplinary action by
a business or occupational or professional licensing board or bureau, for the possession or
purchase of cannabis for medical use by the patient if the quantity of usable cannabis possessed
or purchased does not exceed an adequate supply, as determined by the North Carolina Medical
Care Commission.
(b) A designated caregiver shall not be subject to arrest, prosecution, or penalty in any
manner, or denied any right or privilege, including imposition of a civil penalty or disciplinary
action by a business or occupational or professional licensing board or bureau, for the possession
or purchase of cannabis for medical use by the patient if the quantity of usable cannabis possessed
or purchased does not exceed an adequate supply for the patient, as determined by the North
Carolina Medical Care Commission.
(c) Subsection (a) of this section does not apply to a patient under 18 years of age, unless
all of the following criteria are met:
(1) The patient's physician has explained the potential risks and benefits of the
medical use of cannabis to the patient and to a parent, guardian, or person
having legal custody of the patient.
(2) A parent, guardian, or person having legal custody of the patient consents in
writing to (i) allow the patient's medical use of cannabis, (ii) serve as the
patient's designated caregiver, and (iii) control the dosage and frequency of
the medical use of cannabis by the patient.
(d) A patient or a designated caregiver shall be granted the full legal protections provided
by this Article as long as the patient or designated caregiver is in possession of a registry
identification card issued by the Department of Health and Human Services. If the patient or
designated caregiver is not in possession of a registry identification card, the individual shall be
given an opportunity to produce the registry identification card before the initiation of any arrest,
criminal charges, or other penalties.
(e) A patient or a designated caregiver is presumed to be engaged in the medical use of
cannabis if the patient or designated caregiver is in possession of a registry identification card
and an amount of cannabis that does not exceed the patient's adequate supply. This presumption
may be rebutted only by evidence that the patient or designated caregiver engaged in conduct
Senate Bill 350-First Edition Page 17

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
related to cannabis for a purpose other than alleviating a medical condition of the patient or
symptoms associated with the medical condition.
(f) A designated caregiver may receive reimbursement for costs associated with assisting
a patient in the medical use of cannabis. Reimbursement for these costs does not constitute the
sale of a controlled substance under Article 5 of this Chapter of the General Statutes.
(g) A school, employer, or landlord shall neither refuse to enroll, employ, or lease to nor
otherwise penalize a patient or designated caregiver solely because of (i) the individual's status
as a patient or a designated caregiver or (ii) the presence of cannabis metabolites resulting from
medical use of cannabis in the individual's bodily fluids.
(h) For the purposes of medical care, including organ transplants, a patient's authorized
use of cannabis in accordance with this Article shall be treated in the same manner as the
authorized use of any other medication used at the direction of a physician and shall not constitute
the use of an illegal substance.
(i) A physician shall not be subject to arrest, prosecution, or penalty in any manner, or
denied any right or privilege, or subject to increased monitoring or disciplinary action by the
North Carolina Medical Board or any other business or occupational or professional licensing
board or bureau for either of the following:
(1) Advising a patient about the risks and benefits of the medical use of cannabis
or that the patient may benefit from the medical use of cannabis if, in the
physician's medical judgment, the potential benefits of the medical use of
cannabis would likely outweigh the health risks for that particular patient.
(2) Providing the patient with valid documentation, based upon the physician's
assessment of that patient's medical history and current medical condition, that
the potential benefits of the medical use of cannabis would likely outweigh
the health risks for that particular patient.
(j) A physician shall not be subject to arrest, prosecution, or penalty in any manner, or
denied any right or privilege, or subject to disciplinary action by a business or occupational or
professional licensing board or bureau for discussing with a patient the benefits or health risks of
the medical use of cannabis or the interaction of cannabis with other substances.
(k) State and local law enforcement officers shall not harm, neglect, injure, or destroy an
individual's interest in or right to property that is possessed, owned, or used in connection with
the medical use of cannabis, or acts incidental to the medical use of cannabis, while the property
is in the possession of State or local law enforcement officials as a result of a seizure of the
property in connection with the claimed medical use of cannabis. A person does not forfeit any
right or interest in property seized in connected with the medical use of cannabis under any
provision of State law providing for the forfeiture of property, unless the forfeiture is part of a
sentence imposed upon the person as a result of a conviction of a criminal violation of this Article
or entry of a plea of guilty to such violation. Cannabis, paraphernalia, or other property seized
from a patient or designated caregiver in connection with the claimed medical use of cannabis
shall be returned immediately upon the determination by a court, prosecutor, or law enforcement
officer that the patient or designated caregiver is entitled to the protections of this Article. In
making this determination, the court, a prosecutor, or a law enforcement officer shall consider as
evidence the failure of law enforcement officers to actively investigate the case, a decision not
to prosecute, the dismissal of charges, or acquittal.
(l) A person shall not be denied custody of, or visitation or parenting time with, a minor
for conduct allowed under this Article.
(m) There is no presumption of neglect or child endangerment for conduct allowed under
this Article.
(n) No person shall be subject to arrest or prosecution for constructive possession,
conspiracy, aiding and abetting, being an accessory, or any other offense, for simply being in the
Page 18 Senate Bill 350-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
presence or vicinity of the medical use of cannabis as permitted under this Article or for assisting
a patient with using or administering cannabis.
(o) Possession of or application for a registry identification card shall not alone constitute
probable cause to search the person or the property of the person possessing or applying for a
registry identification card or otherwise subject the person or the person's property to inspection
by any government agency.
(p) If an individual being investigated by a law enforcement officer employed by a
State-funded or locally funded law enforcement agency credibly asserts during the course of the
investigation that the individual is a patient or designated caregiver, neither the law enforcement
officer nor the law enforcement agency shall provide any information, except as required by
federal law or the United States Constitution, from any cannabis-related investigation of the
individual to any law enforcement authority that does not recognize the protections of this
Article. Any prosecution of the individual for a violation of this Article shall be conducted
pursuant to the laws of this State.
(q) Nothing in this Article shall be construed to extend the protections of this Article to
any person, including a patient or designated caregiver, to allow that person to acquire, possess,
manufacture, produce, use, sell, distribute, dispense, or transport cannabis in a manner that is not
consistent with this Article.
"§ 90-751. Registry identification cards for patients and designated caregivers.
(a) The Department shall issue a registry identification card to any patient or designated
caregiver who meets the requirements of this section.
(b) The Department shall not issue or renew a registry identification card to a patient
under 18 years of age unless each of the following criteria is met:
(1) The patient's physician has explained the potential risks and benefits of the
medical use of cannabis to the patient and to a parent, guardian, or person
having legal custody of the patient.
(2) A parent, guardian, or person having legal custody of the patient consents in
writing to (i) allow the patient's medical use of cannabis, (ii) serve as one of
the patient's designated caregivers, and (iii) control the acquisition of the
cannabis, the dosage, and the frequency of medical use of cannabis by the
patient.
(c) The Department shall verify the information contained in a registry identification card
application or renewal application submitted pursuant to this section and shall approve or deny
an application or renewal application within 45 days after receipt. The Department may deny a
registry identification card application or renewal application only if the applicant fails to provide
the information required pursuant to this section or if the Department determines that the
application or renewal application contains false information. If the Department fails to approve
or deny a registration application or renewal application submitted pursuant to this section within
45 days after receipt, the application or renewal application shall be deemed approved and a copy
of the application or renewal application together with proof of receipt by the Department at least
45 days prior to the date this information is presented in lieu of registry identification card shall
be deemed a valid registry identification card.
(d) The Department may issue a registry identification card to a maximum of two
designated caregivers named in a patient's approved application.
(e) The Department shall issue a registry identification card to an applicant within five
days after approving an application or renewal application. The application or renewal
application expires two years after the date of issuance.
(f) Each registry identification card shall contain at least all of the following information:
(1) The date of issuance.
(2) The date of expiration.
(3) A random registry identification number.
Senate Bill 350-First Edition Page 19

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) A photograph of the registry identification cardholder.
(g) Persons issued registry identification cards shall be subject to the following:
(1) A patient who has been issued a registry identification card shall notify the
Department of any change in the patient's name, address, or designated
caregiver and submit a ten dollar ($10.00) fee to the Department within 15
days after the change occurs. A patient who fails to notify the Department of
any of these changes within the specified time frame commits an infraction
and is subject to a fine not to exceed more than one hundred fifty dollars
($150.00).
(2) A designated caregiver shall notify the Department of any change in name or
address and submit a ten dollar ($10.00) fee to the Department within 15 days
after the change occurs. A designated caregiver who fails to notify the
Department of any of these changes within the specified time frame commits
an infraction and is subject to a fine not to exceed one hundred fifty dollars
($150.00).
(3) When a patient or designated caregiver notifies the Department of any change,
as required by this subsection, the Department shall issue the patient and each
designated caregiver a new registry identification card within 10 days after
receiving the updated information and the ten dollar ($10.00) fee.
(4) When a patient who possesses a registry identification card notifies the
Department of a change in designated caregiver, the Department shall notify
the designated caregiver of record of the change within 15 days after receiving
notification of the change. The protections afforded under this Article to the
designated caregiver of record shall expire 30 days after the designated
caregiver of record is notified by the Department of the change in designated
caregiver.
(5) If a patient or a designated caregiver loses a registry identification card, the
cardholder shall notify the Department within 15 days after losing the card.
The notification shall include a ten dollar ($10.00) replacement fee for a new
card. Within five days after receiving notification of a lost registry
identification card, the Department shall issue the cardholder a new registry
identification card with a new random identification number.
(h) If the Department determines that a patient or designated caregiver has willfully
violated any provision of this Article, the Department may suspend or revoke the patient's or
designated caregiver's registry identification card.
(i) Applications and supporting information submitted by patients, including information
regarding their designated caregivers and physicians, are confidential and protected under the
federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996.
(j) The Department shall maintain a confidential list of the persons to whom the
Department has issued registry identification cards. Individual names and other identifying
information on the list are confidential, exempt from the provisions of Chapter 132 of the General
Statutes, and are not subject to disclosure, except to authorized employees of the Department as
necessary to perform official duties of the Department.
(k) The Department shall verify to law enforcement personnel whether a registry
identification card is valid solely by confirming the validity of the random registry identification
number and the name of the person whom the Department has assigned the random registry
identification number.
(l) Any person, including an employee or official of the Department or another State
agency or local government, who breaches the confidentiality of information obtained pursuant
to this section is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor; however, any fine imposed for a violation
under this subsection shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).
Page 20 Senate Bill 350-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(m) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent Department employees from
notifying law enforcement officers about falsified or fraudulent information submitted to the
Department by any individual in support of an application for a registry identification card.
(n) Article 4 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes governs judicial review of an
administrative decision made under this section.
(o) Not later than 120 days after the effective date of this act, the North Carolina Medical
Care Commission shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section, including defining
what constitutes a qualifying medical condition and an adequate supply of medical cannabis. The
rules shall establish requirements for the issuance of registry identification cards to patients and
designated caregivers, which shall include at least all of the following:
(1) Written certification of a statement in a patient's medical records or a
statement signed by a physician with whom the patient has a bona fide
physician-patient relationship indicating that, in the physician's professional
opinion, the patient is likely to receive therapeutic or palliative benefit from
the medical use of cannabis to treat or alleviate the patient's qualifying medical
condition or symptoms associated with the qualifying medical condition and
the potential health benefits of the medical use of cannabis would likely
outweigh the health risks for the patient.
(2) An application for renewal fee.
(3) The name, address, and date of birth of the patient, except that if a patient is
homeless, no address is required.
(4) The name, address, and telephone number of the patient's physician.
(5) The name, address, and date of birth of each of the patient's designated
caregivers, if any."
SECTION 2.2. This Part becomes effective January 1, 2026, and applies to acts
committed on or after that date.

PART III. AUTOMATIC EXPUNCTION OF MARIJUANA OFFENSES
SECTION 3.1. Article 5 of Chapter 15A of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 15A-145.8B. Automatic expunction of certain marijuana offenses.
(a) If a person was charged with an offense involving marijuana or hashish that is legal
under Chapter 18D of the General Statutes, and such person was convicted, such conviction shall
be ordered to be automatically expunged no later than July 1, 2028, in the manner set forth in
this section.
(b) The Administrative Office of the Courts shall determine which offenses meet the
criteria for expunction set forth in subsection (a) of this section. Upon completing the
determination required under this subsection, the Administrative Office of the Courts shall
provide an electronic list of the offenses to the clerk of each superior court. Upon receipt of the
electronic list required under this subsection, the clerk of each superior court shall prepare an
order of expungement for each case that meets the criteria set forth in subsection (a) of this section
and was finalized in his or her court. Upon completion of the order of expungement, the court
shall order the expunction. Upon order of expungement, the clerk shall forward the petition to
the Administrative Office of the Courts.
(c) No person as to whom such an order has been entered under this section shall be held
thereafter under any provision of any law to be guilty of perjury, or to be guilty of otherwise
giving a false statement or response to any inquiry made for any purpose, by reason of the
person's failure to recite or acknowledge any expunged entries concerning apprehension, charge,
or trial.
(d) The court shall also order that the conviction ordered expunged under this section be
expunged from the records of the court and direct all law enforcement agencies bearing record
Senate Bill 350-First Edition Page 21

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
of the same to expunge their records of the conviction. The clerk shall notify State and local
agencies of the court's order as provided in G.S. 15A-150.
(e) Any other applicable State or local government agency shall expunge from its records
entries made as a result of the conviction ordered expunged under this section. The agency shall
also reverse any administrative actions taken against a person whose record is expunged under
this section as a result of the charges or convictions expunged. This subsection shall not apply to
the Department of Justice for DNA records and samples stored in the State DNA Database and
the State DNA Databank."
SECTION 3.2. The Administrative Office of the Courts shall provide the list
required under G.S. 15A-145.8B(b), as enacted by this Part, by October 1, 2027.
SECTION 3.3. This Part becomes effective January 1, 2026.

PART IV. CONFORMING CHANGES
SECTION 4.1. G.S. 90-87(16) is repealed.
SECTION 4.2. G.S. 90-94 is repealed.
SECTION 4.3. G.S. 90-95 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-95. Violations; penalties.
…
(b) Except as provided in subsections (h) and (i) of this section, any person who violates
G.S. 90-95(a)(1) with respect to:
…
(2) A controlled substance classified in Schedule III, IV, V, or VI or V shall be
punished as a Class I felon, except that the sale of a controlled substance
classified in Schedule III, IV, V, or VI or V shall be punished as a Class H
felon. The transfer of less than 5 grams of marijuana for no remuneration shall
not constitute a delivery in violation of G.S. 90-95(a)(1).
…
(d) Except as provided in subsections (h) and (i) of this section, any person who violates
G.S. 90-95(a)(3) with respect to:
…
(4) A controlled substance classified in Schedule VI shall be guilty of a Class 3
misdemeanor, but any sentence of imprisonment imposed must be suspended
and the judge may not require at the time of sentencing that the defendant
serve a period of imprisonment as a special condition of probation. If the
quantity of the controlled substance exceeds one-half of an ounce
(avoirdupois) of marijuana or one-twentieth of an ounce (avoirdupois) of the
extracted resin of marijuana, commonly known as hashish, the violation shall
be punishable as a Class 1 misdemeanor. If the quantity of the controlled
substance exceeds one and one-half ounces (avoirdupois) of marijuana, or
three-twentieths of an ounce (avoirdupois) of the extracted resin of marijuana,
commonly known as hashish, or if the controlled substance consists of any
quantity of synthetic tetrahydrocannabinols or tetrahydrocannabinols isolated
from the resin of marijuana, the violation shall be punishable as a Class I
felony.
…
(e) The prescribed punishment and degree of any offense under this Article shall be
subject to the following conditions, but the punishment for an offense may be increased only by
the maximum authorized under any one of the applicable conditions:
…
(8) Any person 21 years of age or older who commits an offense under
G.S. 90-95(a)(1) on property used for a child care center, or for an elementary
Page 22 Senate Bill 350-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
or secondary school or within 1,000 feet of the boundary of real property used
for a child care center, or for an elementary or secondary school shall be
punished as a Class E felon. For purposes of this subdivision, the transfer of
less than five grams of marijuana for no remuneration shall not constitute a
delivery in violation of G.S. 90-95(a)(1). For purposes of this subdivision, a
child care center is as defined in G.S. 110-86(3)a., and that is licensed by the
Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services.
…
(10) Any person 21 years of age or older who commits an offense under
G.S. 90-95(a)(1) on property that is a public park or within 1,000 feet of the
boundary of real property that is a public park shall be punished as a Class E
felon. For purposes of this subdivision, the transfer of less than five grams of
marijuana for no remuneration shall not constitute a delivery in violation of
G.S. 90-95(a)(1).
…
(h) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the following provisions apply except as
otherwise provided in this Article:
(1) Any person who sells, manufactures, delivers, transports, or possesses in
excess of 10 pounds (avoirdupois) of marijuana shall be guilty of a felony
which felony shall be known as "trafficking in marijuana" and if the quantity
of such substance involved:
a. Is in excess of 10 pounds, but less than 50 pounds, such person shall
be punished as a Class H felon and shall be sentenced to a minimum
term of 25 months and a maximum term of 39 months in the State's
prison and shall be fined not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000);
b. Is 50 pounds or more, but less than 2,000 pounds, such person shall be
punished as a Class G felon and shall be sentenced to a minimum term
of 35 months and a maximum term of 51 months in the State's prison
and shall be fined not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000);
c. Is 2,000 pounds or more, but less than 10,000 pounds, such person
shall be punished as a Class F felon and shall be sentenced to a
minimum term of 70 months and a maximum term of 93 months in the
State's prison and shall be fined not less than fifty thousand dollars
($50,000);
d. Is 10,000 pounds or more, such person shall be punished as a Class D
felon and shall be sentenced to a minimum term of 175 months and a
maximum term of 222 months in the State's prison and shall be fined
not less than two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000).
…."
SECTION 4.4. G.S. 90-113.22A is repealed.
SECTION 4.5. G.S. 90-113.21 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-113.21. General provisions.
(a) As used in this Article, "drug paraphernalia" means all equipment, products and
materials of any kind that are used to facilitate, or intended or designed to facilitate, violations of
the Controlled Substances Act, including planting, propagating, cultivating, growing, harvesting,
manufacturing, compounding, converting, producing, processing, preparing, testing, analyzing,
packaging, repackaging, storing, containing, and concealing controlled substances and injecting,
ingesting, inhaling, or otherwise introducing controlled substances into the human body. "Drug
paraphernalia" includes, but is not limited to, the following:
…
Senate Bill 350-First Edition Page 23

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(7) Separation gins and sifters for removing twigs and seeds from, or otherwise
cleaning or refining, marijuana;
…
(12) Objects for ingesting, inhaling, or otherwise introducing marijuana, cocaine,
hashish, or hashish oil cocaine into the body, such as:
a. Metal, wooden, acrylic, glass, stone, plastic, or ceramic pipes with or
without screens, permanent screens, hashish heads, or punctured metal
bowls;
b. Water pipes;
c. Carburetion tubes and devices;
d. Smoking and carburetion masks;
e. Objects, commonly called roach clips, for holding burning material,
such as a marijuana cigarette, material that has become too small or
too short to be held in the hand;
…."
SECTION 4.6. G.S. 105-113.106 reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-113.106. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
…
(3) Dealer. – Any of the following:
a. A person who actually or constructively possesses more than 42.5
grams of marijuana, seven or more grams of any other controlled
substance other than marijuana that is sold by weight, or 10 or more
dosage units of any other controlled substance that is not sold by
weight.
b. A person who in violation of Chapter 18B of the General Statutes
possesses illicit spirituous liquor for sale.
c. A person who in violation of Chapter 18B of the General Statutes
possesses mash.
d. A person who in violation of Chapter 18B of the General Statutes
possesses an illicit mixed beverage for sale.
…
(6) Marijuana. – All parts of the plant of the genus Cannabis, whether growing or
not; the seeds of this plant; the resin extracted from any part of this plant; and
every compound, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of this plant, its
seeds, or its resin.
…."
SECTION 4.7. G.S. 105-113.107 reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-113.107. Excise tax on unauthorized substances.
(a) Controlled Substances. – An excise tax is levied on controlled substances possessed,
either actually or constructively, by dealers at the following rates:
(1) At the rate of forty cents (40¢) for each gram, or fraction thereof, of harvested
marijuana stems and stalks that have been separated from and are not mixed
with any other parts of the marijuana plant.
(1a) At the rate of three dollars and fifty cents ($3.50) for each gram, or fraction
thereof, of marijuana, other than separated stems and stalks taxed under
subdivision (1) of this [sub]section, or synthetic cannabinoids.
(1b) At the rate of fifty dollars ($50.00) for each gram, or fraction thereof, of
cocaine.
(1c) At the rate of fifty dollars ($50.00) for each gram, or fraction thereof, of any
low-street-value drug that is sold by weight.
Page 24 Senate Bill 350-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) At the rate of two hundred dollars ($200.00) for each gram, or fraction thereof,
of any other controlled substance that is sold by weight.
(2a) At the rate of fifty dollars ($50.00) for each 10 dosage units, or fraction
thereof, of any low-street-value drug that is not sold by weight.
(3) At the rate of two hundred dollars ($200.00) for each 10 dosage units, or
fraction thereof, of any other controlled substance that is not sold by weight.
(a1) Weight. – A quantity of marijuana or other controlled substance is measured by the
weight of the substance whether pure or impure or dilute, or by dosage units when the substance
is not sold by weight, in the dealer's possession. A quantity of a controlled substance is dilute if
it consists of a detectable quantity of pure controlled substance and any excipients or fillers.
…."
SECTION 4.8. G.S. 105-113.107A reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-113.107A. Exemptions.
(a) Authorized Possession. – The tax levied in this Article does not apply to a substance
in the possession of a dealer who is authorized by law to possess the substance. This exemption
applies only during the time the dealer's possession of the substance is authorized by law.
(b) Certain Marijuana Parts. – The tax levied in this Article does not apply to the
following marijuana:
(1) Harvested mature marijuana stalks when separated from and not mixed with
any other parts of the marijuana plant.
(2) Fiber or any other product of marijuana stalks described in subdivision (1) of
this subsection, except resin extracted from the stalks.
(3) Marijuana seeds that have been sterilized and are incapable of germination.
(4) Roots of the marijuana plant."
SECTION 4.9. G.S. 105-113.108(b)(1) is repealed.
SECTION 4.10. G.S. 106-134(4) reads as rewritten:
"(4) If it is for use by man and contains any quantity of the narcotic or hypnotic
substance alphaeucaine, barbituric acid, betaeucaine, bromal, cannabis,
carbromal, chloral, coca, cocaine, codeine, heroin, marijuana, morphine,
opium, paraldehyde, peyote, or sulphonmethane; or any chemical derivative
of such substances, which derivative has been by the Board after investigation,
found to be, and by regulations under this Article, designated as, habit
forming; unless its label bears the name and quantity or proportion of such
substance or derivative and in juxtaposition therewith the statement "Warning
– May be habit forming.""
SECTION 4.11. G.S. 148-64.1(a)(2)e. is repealed.
SECTION 4.12. G.S. 90-94.1 is repealed.
SECTION 4.13. This Part becomes effective January 1, 2026, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.

PART V. SAVINGS CLAUSE, SEVERABILITY CLAUSE, AND EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 5.1. Prosecutions for offenses committed before the effective date of this
act are not abated or affected by this act, and the statutes that would be applicable but for this act
remain applicable to those prosecutions.
SECTION 5.2. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, the
invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this act that can be given effect
without the invalid provisions or application and, to this end, the provisions of this act are
severable.
SECTION 5.3. Except as otherwise provided in this act, this act is effective when it
becomes law.
Senate Bill 350-First Edition Page 25